pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol: Acessórios para bases de beisebol e softbol; Bases de beisebol e softball; Grips para taco de beisebol e softbol; Luvas de rebatedor de beisebol e softball; Bolsas de equipamentos para beisebol e softbol; Ferramentas de marcação de campo de beisebol e softbol; Acessórios e cuidados com luvas de beisebol e softbol; Luvas e mitenes de beisebol e softball; Punhos para arremesso de beisebol e softbol; Esteiras de arremesso para beisebol e softbol; Montes de arremesso para beisebol e softbol; Borrachas para arremesso de beisebol e softbol; Equipamento de proteção para beisebol e softbol; Auxílios de treinamento para beisebol e softbol; Tacos de beisebol; Bolas de beisebol; Acessórios para máquinas de arremesso; Máquinas de arremesso; Tacos de softbol; Softball
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol: Accesorios para bases de béisbol y sóftbol; Bases de béisbol y softball; Cintas de agarre para bates de béisbol y sóftbol; Guantes para batear de béisbol y softball; Bolsos para equipo de béisbol y sóftbol; Herramientas para marcar campos de béisbol y sóftbol; Accesorios y cuidado de guantes de béisbol y sóftbol; Guantes de béisbol y softball; Puños de lanzamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Esterillas de lanzamiento para béisbol y sóftbol; Montículos de lanzamiento para béisbol y sóftbol; Gomas de lanzamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Equipamiento protector para béisbol y sóftbol; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de béisbol y softbol; Bates de béisbol; Pelotas de béisbol; Accesorios para máquinas de pitcheo; Máquinas de lanzamiento de pelotas; Bates de sóftbol; Pelotas de sóftbol
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball: Příslušenství k metám pro baseball a softball; Baseballové a softballové mety; Omotávky na baseballové a softballové pálky; Pálkařské rukavice na baseball a softball; Tašky na baseballové a softballové vybavení; Nástroje na značení hřiště pro baseball a softball; Péče a příslušenství pro baseballové a softballové rukavice; Rukavice na baseball a softball; Pálkařské rukavičky na baseball a softball; Nadhazovací mety pro baseball a softball; Nadhazovací kopce pro baseball a softball; Duté gumové mety pro nadhazovače pro baseball a softball; Ochranné vybavení na baseball a softball; Tréninkové pomůcky na baseball a softball; Baseballové pálky; Baseballové míčky; Příslušenství k nadhazovacím strojům; Odpalovací stroje; Softbalové pálky; Softbalové míčky
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼: 야구 및 소프트볼 베이스 액세서리; 야구 및 소프트볼 베이스/플레이트; 야구 및 소프트볼 배트 그립; 야구/소프트볼 타격용 장갑; 야구 및 소프트볼 장비 가방; 야구 및 소프트볼 경기장 마킹 도구; 야구 및 소프트볼 글러브 관리 및 액세서리; 야구 및 소프트볼 장갑/글러브; 야구/소프트볼 투수 그립; 야구/소프트볼 투수판; 야구/소프트볼 투수 마운드; 야구/소프트볼 투수 마운드 고무; 야구/소프트볼 보호 장비; 야구/소프트볼 훈련 장비; 야구 배트; 야구; 피칭 머신 액세서리; 피칭 머신; 소프트볼 배트; 소프트볼
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball: Baseball & Softball Base Accessories; Baseball & Softball Bases & Plates; Baseball & Softball Bat Grips; Baseball & Softball Batting Gloves; Baseball & Softball Equipment Bags; Baseball & Softball Field Marking Tools; Baseball & Softball Glove Care & Accessories; Baseball & Softball Gloves & Mitts; Baseball & Softball Pitching Grips; Baseball & Softball Pitching Mats; Baseball & Softball Pitching Mounds; Baseball & Softball Pitching Rubbers; Baseball & Softball Protective Gear; Baseball & Softball Training Aids; Baseball Bats; Baseballs; Pitching Machine Accessories; Pitching Machines; Softball Bats; Softballs
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол: Аксессуары для баз (бейсбол и софтбол); Базы и пластины для бейсбола и софтбола; Обмотки для бейсбольных и софтбольных бит; Перчатки бэттера для бейсбола и софтбола; Сумки для бейсбольной и софтбольной экипировки; Инструменты для разметки поля (бейсбол и софтбол); Средства по уходу и аксессуары для перчаток (бейсбол и софтбол); Перчатки и ловушки для бейсбола и софтбола; Средства для улучшения хвата питчеров для бейсбола и софтбола; Коврики для питчеров для бейсбола и софтбола; Горки для питчеров для бейсбола и софтбола; Резиновые упоры для питчеров для бейсбола и софтбола; Защитная экипировка для бейсбола и софтбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для бейсбола и софтбола; Бейсбольные биты; Бейсбольные мячи; Аксессуары для питчинг-машин; Пушки для подачи мячей; Софтбольные биты; Софтбольные мячи
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball: Tilbehør til baser for baseball og softball; Baser og plater for baseball og softball; Grep for baseball- og softballtre; Kastehansker for baseball og softball; Utstyrsbager for baseball og softball; Baneoppmerkingsutstyr for baseball og softball; Pleie og tilbehør til hansker for baseball og softball; Hansker og votter for baseball og softball; Kastegrep for baseball og softball; Kastematter for baseball og softball; Kastehauger for baseball og softball; Kastegummi for baseball og softball; Beskyttelsesutstyr for baseball og softball; Treningshjelpemidler for baseball og softball; Baseballtrær; Baseballer; Tilbehør til kastemaskiner; Kastemaskiner; Softballtrær; Softballer
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball: Dodatki za baze za baseball in softball; Baze in podloge za baseball in softball; Baseball in Softball Prijemi za kije; Rokavice za odbijanje za baseball in softball; Baseball in Softball Vreče za opremo; Baseball in Softball Orodja za označevanje igrišča; Nega in dodatki za rokavice za baseball in softball; Rokavice in palčniki za baseball in softball; Prijemi za metanje žoge za baseball in softball; Podloge za metanje žoge za baseball in softball; Nakloni za metanje žoge za baseball in softball; Gume za metanje žoge za baseball in softball; Zaščitna oprema za baseball in softball; Pripomočki za vadbo baseballa in softballa; Palice za baseball; Žoge za baseball; Dodatki za stroj za metanje; Stroji za podajanje žog; Palice za softball; Žoge za softball
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол: Аксесоари за бейзболни и софтболни бази; Бази и плочи за бейзбол и софтбол; Ръкохватки за бейзболни и софтбол бухалки; Ръкавици за батиране за бейзбол и софтбол; Чанти за екипировка за бейзбол и софтбол; Инструменти за маркиране на игрища за бейзбол и софтбол; Аксесоари и продукти за поддръжка на ръкавици за бейзбол и софтбол; Ръкавици за бейзбол и софтбол; Ръкохватки за хвърляне при бейзбол и софтбол; Постелки за хвърляне при бейзбол и софтбол; Могили за хвърляне при бейзбол и софтбол; Гумени стопери при хвърляне за бейзбол и софтбол; Защитна екипировка за бейзбол и софтбол; Помощни средства за тренировки по бейзбол и софтбол; Бейзболни бухалки; Бейзболни топки; Аксесоари за машини за подаване на топки; Машини за хвърляне на топки; Бухалки за софтбол; Топки за софтбол
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball: Tilbehør til baser til baseball og softball; Baseballbaser; Batgreb til baseball og softball; Batterhandsker; Udstyrstasker til baseball og softball; Udstyr til baneopstregning til baseball og softball; Pleje og tilbehør til baseball- og softballhandsker; Baseball- og softballhandsker; Baseball- og softballhandsker til pitch; Pitchmåtter til baseball og softball; Pitchplader til baseball og softball; Pitchgummi til baseball og softball; Beskyttelsesudstyr til baseball og softball; Baseball og softball – træningshjælpemidler; Baseballbat; Bolde til baseball; Tilbehør til pitchingmaskiner; Kastemaskiner; Softballbat; Bolde til softball
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball: Akcesoria do baz do baseballu i softballu; Bazy i płyty baseballowe i softballowe; Owijki na kije do baseballu i softballu; Rękawice dla pałkarzy; Torby na sprzęt do baseballu i softballu; Narzędzia do wyznaczania boisk do baseballu i softballu; Akcesoria i środki do pielęgnacji rękawic do baseballu i softballu; Rękawice i łapawice baseballowe i softballowe; Uchwyt do miotacza w baseballu i softballu; Maty do rzutów w baseballu i softballu; Podwyższenie dla miotacza w baseballu i softballu; Gumy do miotacza w baseballu i softballu; Odzież ochronna do baseballa i softballa; Pomoce treningowe do baseballa i softballa; Kije baseballowe; Piłki baseballowe; Akcesoria do maszyn do rzucania piłek; Maszyny do wyrzucania piłek; Kije do gry w softball; Softball
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal: Accessoires voor honkbal- en softbalhonken; Honken en platen voor honkbal en softbal; Knuppelgrips voor honkbal en softbal; Slaghandschoenen voor honkbal en softbal; Uitrustingstassen voor honkbal en softbal; Gereedschap voor honkbal- en softbalveldmarkering; Verzorging en accessoires voor honkbal- en softbalhandschoenen; Honkbal- en softbalhandschoenen; Werphandgrepen voor honkbal en softbal; Werpplaten voor honkbal en softbal; Werpheuvels voor honkbal en softbal; Werprubbers voor honkbal en softbal; Beschermende uitrusting voor honkbal en softbal; Trainingshulpmiddelen voor honkbal en softbal; Honkbalknuppels; Honkballen; Accessoires voor pitchingmachines; Werpmachines; Softbalknuppels; Softbalballen
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball: Bastillbehör för baseboll och softboll; Baseball- och softballbaser och -plattor; Grepplindor för baseboll- och softbollslagträn; Slagmanshandskar för baseball och softball; Utrustningsväskor för baseboll och softboll; Planmarkering för baseboll och softboll; Handskvård och tillbehör för baseboll och softboll; Baseball- och softballhandskar; Pitchergrepp för baseball och softball; Pitchermattor för baseball och softball; Pitcherkullar för baseball och softball; Pitchergummi för baseball och softball; Skyddsutrustning för baseball och softball; Träningshjälpmedel för baseboll och softboll; Basebollträn; Basebollar; Tillbehör för kastmaskiner; Kastmaskiner; Softballslagträn; Softballbollar
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal: Príslušenstvo pre bejzbalové a softbalové méty; Baseballové a softbalové základne a platne; Rukoväte na bejzbalové a softbalové pálky; Bejzbalové a softbalové odpaľovacie rukavice; Tašky na bejzbalové a softbalové vybavenie; Nástroje na značenie bejzbalových a softbalových ihrísk; Starostlivosť o bejzbalové a softbalové rukavice a príslušenstvo; Baseballové a softbalové rukavice; Bejzbalové a softbalové rukavice pre nadhadzovača; Bejzbalové a softbalové podložky pre nadhadzovača; Bejzbalové a softbalové trávniky pre nadhadzovača; Bejzbalové a softbalové gumy pre nadhadzovača; Baseballové a softbalové ochranné pomôcky; Bejzbalové a softbalové tréningové pomôcky; Bejzbalové pálky; Bejzbalové lopty; Príslušenstvo k nadhadzovacím strojom; Nadhadzovacie stroje; Softbalové pálky; Softbalové lopty
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品: 棒球和垒球垒包配件; 棒球本垒板; 棒垒球球棒握把带; 棒球和垒球击球手套; 棒垒球装备包; 棒球和垒球场地划线工具; 棒球和垒球手套护理用品及配件; 棒球/垒球手套; 棒球/垒球投球手套; 棒球/垒球投球练习垫; 棒球/垒球投手丘; 棒球/垒球投球投手板; 棒球/垒球护具; 棒球/垒球训练辅助用品; 棒球球棒; 棒球; 发球机配件; 投球机; 垒球棒; 垒球
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol: Dodaci za baze za bejzbol i softbol; Podloge i baze za bejzbol i softbol; Hvatovi za palice za bejzbol i softbol; Rukavice za bejzbol i softbol; Torbe za opremu za bejzbol i softbol; Alat za iscrtavanje terena za bejzbol i softbol; Pribor za održavanje rukavica za bejzbol i softbol; Rukavice za bejzbol i softbol sa i bez prstiju; Ručke za bacanje za bejzbol i softbol; Podloge za bejzbol i softbol teren; Baza za izbačaj u bejzbolu i softbolu; Guma za izbačaj u bejzbolu i softbolu; Zaštitna oprema za bejzbol i softbol; Pomagala za trening bejzbola i softbola; Palice za bejzbol; Loptice za bejzbol; Dodaci za stroj za izbacivanje loptica; Strojevi za bacanje; Palice za softbol; Loptice za softbol
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol: Acessórios de bases para basebol e softbol; Placas e bases para basebol e softbol; Fitas de aderência para tacos de basebol e softbol; Luvas de rebatida para basebol e softbol; Sacos de equipamento de basebol e softbol; Ferramentas de marcação de campo para basebol e softbol; Cuidados e acessórios para luvas de basebol e softbol; Luvas de lançamento/receção para basebol e softbol; Luvas de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Tapetes de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Montes de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Borrachas de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Equipamento de proteção para basebol e softbol; Auxiliares de treino para basebol e softbol; Tacos de basebol; Bolas de basebol; Acessórios para máquinas de lançamento; Máquinas de lançamento; Tacos de softbol; Bolas de softbol
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball: Baseball- ja softball-pesien lisävarusteet; Baseball- ja softball-pesät ja -laatat; Baseball- ja softball-mailojen gripit; Baseball- ja softball-lyöntihanskat; Baseball- ja softball-varustekassit; Baseball- ja softball-kentän merkintätyökalut; Baseball- ja softball-räpylöiden hoitotuotteet ja lisävarusteet; Baseball- ja softball-hanskat ja -räpylät; Baseball- ja softball-hanskat; Baseball- ja softball-syöttöalustat; Baseball- ja softball-syöttökummut; Baseball- ja softball-syöttökumit; Baseball- ja softball-suojat; Baseball- ja softball-harjoittelun apuvälineet; Baseball-mailat; Baseball-pallot; Syöttölaitteiden lisävarusteet; Syöttökoneet; Softball-mailat; Softball-pallot
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball: Baseball- és softballbázis-kiegészítők; Baseball és softball alapok és bázisok; Baseball és softball ütőmarkolatok; Baseball és softball ütőkesztyűk; Baseball és softball felszerelés táskák; Baseball- és softballpálya-vonalazó eszközök; Baseball- és softballkesztyű-ápolók és -kiegészítők; Baseball és softball kesztyűk; Baseball és Softball dobómarkolatok; Baseball és Softball dobószőnyegek; Baseball és softball dobóhalmok; Baseball és softball dobógumik; Baseball és softball védőfelszerelés; Baseball és softball edzéssegédek; Baseballütők; Baseballok; Adogatógép-kiegészítők; Dobógépek; Softballütők; Softballok
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball: Accesorii pentru baze de baseball și softball; Baze și plăci de baseball și softball; Gripuri pentru bâte de baseball și softball; Mănuși de baseball și softball; Genți de echipamente pentru baseball și softball; Dispozitive pentru marcarea terenului de baseball și softball; Accesorii și produse de întreținere pentru mănuși de baseball și softball; Mănuși și mănuși fără degete pentru baseball și softball; Prize de aruncare pentru minge de baseball și softball; Covorașe de aruncare pentru baseball și softball; Movile de aruncare pentru baseball și softball; Marcaje pentru baseball și softball; Echipament de protecție pentru baseball și softball; Articole de antrenament pentru baseball și softball; Bâte de baseball; Mingi de baseball; Accesorii pentru mașini de aruncat mingi; Mașini de aruncare; Bâte de softball; Mingi de softball
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol: Beyzbol ve softbol kale aksesuarları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Kaleleri ve Plakaları; Beyzbol ve softbol sopa sargıları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Vuruş Eldivenleri; Beyzbol ve softbol ekipman çantaları; Beyzbol ve softbol saha işaretleme araçları; Beyzbol ve softbol eldiven bakımı ve aksesuarları; Beyzbol ve Softball Eldivenleri; Beyzbol ve Softbol Atış Tutacakları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Kale Matları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Kale Atış Noktaları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Atış Lastikleri; Beyzbol ve Softbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Beyzbol ve Softbol Eğitim Araçları; Beyzbol Sopaları; Beyzbol Topları; Atış makinesi aksesuarları; Top Fırlatma Makineleri; Softball Sopaları; Softball Topları
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball: Accessori per basi da baseball e softball; Piatti e basi per baseball e softball; Grip per mazze da baseball e softball; Guanti da battitore per baseball e softball; Borse per attrezzatura da baseball e softball; Strumenti per tracciatura di campi da baseball e softball; Cura e accessori per guantoni da baseball e softball; Guanti da baseball e softball; Impugnature da lancio per baseball e softball; Tappetini da lancio per baseball e softball; Monti di lancio per baseball e softball; Gommini per lancio di baseball e softball; Protezioni per baseball e softball; Ausili per l'allenamento di baseball e softball; Mazze da baseball; Palle da baseball; Accessori per macchine lanciapalle; Macchine da lancio; Mazze da softball; Softball
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm: Phụ kiện chốt gôn bóng chày và bóng mềm; Gôn bóng chày & bóng mềm; Quấn cán gậy bóng chày và bóng mềm; Găng tay bóng chày và bóng mềm; Túi đựng dụng cụ bóng chày và bóng mềm; Dụng cụ kẻ vạch sân bóng chày và bóng mềm; Phụ kiện và sản phẩm chăm sóc găng tay bóng chày và bóng mềm; Găng tay Bóng chày & Bóng mềm; Cách cầm ném bóng chơi bóng chày & bóng mềm; Thảm cỏ sân bóng chày & bóng mềm; Ụ ném bóng chày và bóng mềm; Vạch cao su ném bóng khi chơi bóng chày & bóng mềm; Găng đeo bảo vệ Bóng chày & Bóng mềm; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng chày & bóng mềm; Gậy bóng chày; Bóng chày; Phụ kiện máy ném bóng; Máy bắn bóng; Gậy bóng mềm; Bóng mềm
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ: Αξεσουάρ βάσεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Βάσεις & πλάκες μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Λαβές για ρόπαλα μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Γάντια για χειριστή ροπάλου μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Τσάντες εξοπλισμού μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Εργαλεία διαγράμμισης γηπέδων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Αξεσουάρ & φροντίδα γαντιών μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Γάντια & γάντια χωρίς χωρίσματα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Λαβές ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Στρώματα ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Υψώματα ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Λαστιχένιες βάσεις ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Ρόπαλα μπέιζμπολ; Μπάλες μπέιζμπολ; Αξεσουάρ μηχανημάτων ρίψης μπαλών; Μηχανές ρίψεων; Ρόπαλα σόφτμπολ; Μπάλες σόφτμπολ
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball: Accessoires de bases de baseball et de softball; Bases et plaques de base-ball et de softball; Rubans adhésifs pour battes de baseball et de softball; Gants de batteurs de base-ball et de softball; Sacs d'équipement de baseball et de softball; Outils de marquage de terrains de baseball et de softball; Entretien et accessoires pour gants de baseball et de softball; Gants et mitaines de base-ball et de softball; Poignées de lancer de baseball et de softball; Plaques de lanceur; Monticules de lanceur; Tapis de lancer de baseball et de softball; Équipement de protection de base-ball et softball; Aides à l'entraînement au baseball et au softball; Battes de baseball; Balles de baseball; Accessoires de machines à lancer; Lance-balles; Battes de softball; Softballs
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเบสเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ฐานและแผ่นสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; กริปพันด้ามไม้เบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ถุงมือเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; กระเป๋าใส่อุปกรณ์เบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; อุปกรณ์ตีเส้นสนามเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; อุปกรณ์ดูแลรักษาและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับถุงมือเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ถุงมือและถุงนวมสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ที่จับสำหรับขว้างเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; แผ่นยางยืนขว้างลูกสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; เนินยืนขว้างลูกเทียมสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ยางขว้างเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ไม้เบสบอล; เบสบอล; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องยิงลูก; เครื่องยิงลูกอัตโนมัติ; ไม้ซอฟท์บอล; ซอฟท์บอล
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球: 棒壘球壘包配件; 棒壘球壘板; 棒壘球握把布; 棒壘球打擊手套; 棒壘球裝備袋; 棒壘球場地劃線工具; 棒壘球手套保養用品與配件; 棒壘球手套; 棒壘球投手握把; 棒壘球投手墊; 棒壘球投手丘; 棒壘球投手橡膠; 棒壘球護具; 棒壘球投手訓練輔助用品; 棒球棒; 棒球用球; 發球機配件; 投球機; 壘球棒; 壘球
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品: 野球・ソフトボール用ベースアクセサリー; 野球・ソフトボール用ベース・プレート; 野球・ソフトボール用バットグリップ; 野球・ソフトボール用バッティンググローブ; 野球・ソフトボール用具バッグ; 野球・ソフトボール用フィールドマーキングツール; 野球・ソフトボール用グラブケア用品＆アクセサリー; 野球・ソフトボール用グローブ・ミット; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチンググリップ; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチングマット; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチャーマウンド; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチングラバー; 野球・ソフトボール用プロテクター; 野球・ソフトボール練習器具; 野球バット; 野球ボール; ピッチングマシンアクセサリー; ピッチングマシン; ソフトボール用バット; ソフトボール
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas: Beisbolo ir softbolo bazių priedai; Beisbolo ir softbolo bazės ir lėkštės; Beisbolo ir softbolo lazdų rankenų apvijos; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušėjo pirštinės; Beisbolo ir softbolo įrangos krepšiai; Beisbolo ir softbolo aikštės žymėjimo įrankiai; Beisbolo ir softbolo pirštinių priežiūra ir priedai; Beisbolo ir softbolo pirštinės ir kumštinės pirštinės; Beisbolo ir softbolo kamuoliuko suėmimą gerinančios priemonės; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo kilimėliai; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo pakylos; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo žymekliai; Beisbolo ir softbolo apsauginės priemonės; Beisbolo ir softbolo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Beisbolo lazdos; Beisbolo kamuoliukai; Metimo mašinų priedai; Metimo mašinos; Softbolo lazdos; Softbolo kamuoliukai
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball: Zubehör für Baseball- & Softball-Bases; Baseball- & Softball-Bases & -Platten; Schlägergriffe für Baseball & Softball; Baseball- & Softball-Schlaghandschuhe; Ausrüstungstaschen für Baseball & Softball; Feldmarkierungswerkzeuge für Baseball & Softball; Pflege & Zubehör für Baseball- & Softball-Handschuhe; Baseball- & Softballhandschuhe; Baseball- & Softball-Pitching-Griffe; Baseball- & Softball-Wurfmale; Baseball- & Softball-Wurfhügel; Baseball- & Softball-Pitching-Beläge; Baseball- & Softball-Schutzkleidung; Baseball- & Softball-Trainingshilfen; Baseballschläger; Baseball-Bälle; Zubehör für Wurfmaschinen; Wurfmaschinen; Softballschläger; Softball-Bälle